Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.506

Merger—Not effective within sixty days—Transfer restrictions.

(1) If the proposed merger does not become effective within sixty days after the date set for demanding payment, the limited liability company must release any transfer restrictions imposed as permitted by RCW 25.15.496.

(2) If, after releasing transfer restrictions, the proposed merger becomes effective, the limited liability company must send a new dissenters' notice as provided in RCW 25.15.476(2) and 25.15.486 and repeat the payment demand procedure.

[ 2015 c 188 s 97.]